Georgia statutes. 
Coroner's right to reimbursement. - When a coroner, not officially but as an individual, caused dead paupers, the victims of a storm, to be buried decently, the coroner was entitled to be reimbursed by the county. Walker v. Sheftall, 73 Ga. 806 (1884).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Nature of county's responsibility. - County has fulfilled the county's responsibility under this section when the county makes available from county funds at least $75.00, but not more than $125.00, to provide a decent interment for a deceased pauper; whether these funds are used to provide a lined pine coffin, plus normal burial expenses, or any other means of decent interment, is at the option of the county. 1971 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U71-129 (decided prior to 1991 amendment deleting provisions relating to minimum and maximum amounts from O.C.G.A. § 36-12-5).

——————————

CHAPTER 13

BUILDING, ELECTRICAL, AND OTHER CODES

Sec.

36-13-1. Creation, adoption, amendment, and repeal of codes.

36-13-2. Matters which may be covered by county codes.

36-13-3. Adoption of codes by reference to national or regional codes.

36-13-4. Contracts with other political subdivisions to issue building permits and enforce codes.

36-13-5. Appointment of inspectors and assistants.

36-13-5.1. Issuance of citations for violation in certain counties; jurisdiction; warrant for arrest for failure to appear in response to citation.

36-13-6. Promulgation of rules and regulations concerning permits and inspections; establishment of fees or charges.

36-13-7. Areas to which codes, rules, and regulations may be made applicable.

36-13-8. Notice and hearing prior to enactment of codes, rules, or regulations.

36-13-9. Appropriation and expenditure of funds.

36-13-10. Remedies for actual or proposed violations of codes, rules, or regulations.

36-13-11. Compliance as prerequisite to issuance of permit; failure to secure required permit.

36-13-12. Criminal penalty for violations of codes, rules, or regulations.

Annotations

Cross references. - Adoption by counties and municipalities of the Georgia State Plumbing Code, the Georgia State Electrical Code, § 8-2-20 et seq. Local Government Code Enforcement Boards, § 36-74-1 et seq.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Authority of county to impose additional tax on building permits. - Ga. L. 1960, p. 560, § 1 et seq. does not give a county the authority to impose a tax or charge in addition to all charges currently imposed for building permits, when those funds are allocated directly to the board of education. DeKalb County v. Brown Bldrs. Co., 227 Ga. 777, 183 S.E.2d 367 (1971).

36-13-1. Creation, adoption, amendment, and repeal of codes.

Statute text

The county governing authority in this state is authorized to make, adopt, amend, and repeal building, housing, electrical, plumbing, gas, and other similar codes relating to the construction, livability, sanitation, erection, equipment, alteration, repair, occupancy, or removal of buildings and structures located outside of the corporate limits of any municipality in the county.

History

(Ga. L. 1961, p. 560, § 1.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 13 Am. Jur. 2d, Buildings, §§ 2 et seq., 44.

ALR. - Rights of permittee under illegally issued building permit, 6 A.L.R.2d 960.

Zoning authority as estopped from revoking legally issued building permit, 26 A.L.R.5th 736.

36-13-2. Matters which may be covered by county codes.

Statute text

The codes authorized in Code Section 36-13-1 may embrace such matters as the preparation and submission of plans and specifications; issuance of permits; standards governing the kind, quality, and performance of materials, equipment, and workmanship; establishment of fire zones; fireproofing; means of egress and ingress; floor area per occupant; and sanitary facilities and usage proceedings in connection with unsafe, unsanitary, or inadequate structures. The enumeration in this Code section shall not be construed as being exclusive.

History

(Ga. L. 1961, p. 560, § 2.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 13 Am. Jur. 2d, Buildings, § 13 et seq.

C.J.S. - 101A C.J.S., Zoning and Land Planning, § 255 et seq.

36-13-3. Adoption of codes by reference to national or regional codes.

Statute text

The codes authorized in Code Section 36-13-1 may be adopted by reference to national or regional codes.

History

(Ga. L. 1961, p. 560, § 3.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in Wilson v. Auto-Owners Ins. Co., 159 Ga. App. 315, 283 S.E.2d 308 (1981).

36-13-4. Contracts with other political subdivisions to issue building permits and enforce codes.

Statute text

The county governing authority is permitted to contract with municipalities and other political subdivisions of the state possessing the authority to issue building permits and to enforce building, electrical, plumbing, gas, housing, and other similar codes, in order to administer efficiently the powers granted under this chapter.

History

(Ga. L. 1961, p. 560, § 4.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 423 et seq.

36-13-5. Appointment of inspectors and assistants.

Statute text

The county governing authority shall have the authority to appoint building, electrical, plumbing, gas, and housing inspectors for its county and to appoint such other assistants as the authority may deem necessary.

History

(Ga. L. 1961, p. 560, § 5.)

36-13-5.1. Issuance of citations for violation in certain counties; jurisdiction; warrant for arrest for failure to appear in response to citation.

Statute text

In all counties of this state having a population of 550,000 or more according to the United States decennial census of 1970 or any future such census, any employee who is authorized to enforce any county code, ordinance, regulation, rule, or other order, including such related ordinances, codes, and regulations as drainage regulations, soil erosion and sedimentation control regulations, subdivision and zoning regulations, water and sewer regulations, and any other land development or construction regulations of such county, shall have the authority to issue citations to any person who shall violate any such county code, ordinance, regulation, or order which shall be in effect in such counties. Such citations shall command the appearance of such person at a designated regular session of a court in such county having the jurisdiction of a commitment court throughout the entire county. At such time and place such court shall act as a court of inquiry with all the powers and authorities as specified in Code Section 17-8-5. In the event that any such person shall fail to appear in response to a citation, a warrant shall be issued for the arrest of such person for violation of such county code, ordinance, regulation, rule, or order without the necessity of any further action.

History

(Ga. L. 1981, p. 3261, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-13-5.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, § 35; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 27; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36.)

36-13-6. Promulgation of rules and regulations concerning permits and inspections; establishment of fees or charges.

Statute text

The county governing authority shall have the authority to make rules and regulations concerning permits for and inspections of construction equipment and the alteration, repair, or removal of buildings, signs, and other structures outside the corporate limits of municipalities located in its county. It may prescribe fees or charges for permits and inspections, which fees shall be fixed and charged by the governing authority and shall be paid to the county treasurer by the applicant for such permits or inspections.

History

(Ga. L. 1961, p. 560, § 6.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 13 Am. Jur. 2d, Buildings, § 9 et seq.

C.J.S. - 101A C.J.S., Zoning and Land Planning, §§ 64, 65, 131, 255, 256.

36-13-7. Areas to which codes, rules, and regulations may be made applicable.

Statute text

The county governing authority shall have the authority to make such codes, rules, and regulations as are permitted under this chapter for:

(1) The entire unincorporated area of the county;

(2) Any militia district within the unincorporated area of the county;

(3) Any land lot;

(4) Any land and water areas 500 feet wide on either side of any state or county highway or any section of such highway within the unincorporated area of the county;

(5) Any land or water areas 500 feet wide on either side of any water line of the stream or water reservoir or section thereof within the unincorporated area of the county; or

(6) Any portion of the unincorporated area of the county lying within a specified distance of the boundaries of a municipality in the county.

History

(Ga. L. 1961, p. 560, § 8.)

36-13-8. Notice and hearing prior to enactment of codes, rules, or regulations.

Statute text

Before enacting any of the codes, rules, or regulations permitted in this chapter, the county governing authority shall hold a public hearing thereon. At least 15 days' notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county.

History

(Ga. L. 1961, p. 560, § 7.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 101A C.J.S., Zoning and Land Planning, § 14.

ALR. - What constitutes newspaper of "general circulation" within meaning of state statutes requiring publication of official notices and the like in such newspaper, 24 A.L.R.4th 822.

36-13-9. Appropriation and expenditure of funds.

Statute text

The county governing authorities are authorized to appropriate and expend funds for the purposes of this chapter.

History

(Ga. L. 1961, p. 560, § 12.)

36-13-10. Remedies for actual or proposed violations of codes, rules, or regulations.

Statute text

When any violation of any of the codes, rules, and regulations which are adopted by the county governing authority under this chapter is or is proposed to be committed, the inspectors appointed under this chapter, the county attorney, some other appropriate authority of the county, or any adjacent or neighboring property owner who would be damaged by the violation, in addition to other remedies, may institute injunction, mandamus, or other appropriate action or proceeding to prevent, correct, or abate the violation or threatened violation.

History

(Ga. L. 1961, p. 560, § 11.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 101A C.J.S., Zoning and Land Planning, § 432 et seq.

36-13-11. Compliance as prerequisite to issuance of permit; failure to secure required permit.

Statute text

Full compliance with all rules, regulations, and requirements set up under this chapter shall be a prerequisite to issuance of any permit. Failure to secure such permit as is required is declared to be a misdemeanor.

History

(Ga. L. 1961, p. 560, § 9.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 13 Am. Jur. 2d, Buildings, § 8 et seq.

C.J.S. - 101A C.J.S., Zoning and Land Planning, § 255 et seq.

36-13-12. Criminal penalty for violations of codes, rules, or regulations.

Statute text

The violation of any of the codes, rules, and regulations adopted by the county governing authority under this chapter is declared to be a misdemeanor. Any person violating any such codes, rules, and regulations shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Each and every day such violation continues shall be deemed a separate offense.

History

(Ga. L. 1961, p. 560, § 10.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 101A C.J.S., Zoning and Land Planning, § 449 et seq.

——————————

CHAPTER 14

COUNTY BRIDGES

Sec.

36-14-1. Erection of bridges across navigable streams.

36-14-2. Building and maintaining bridges over rivers bordering adjacent states.

36-14-3. Contracts with federal government for bridges across streams bordering land ceded to United States.

Annotations

Cross references. - Acquisition of property by counties and municipalities for transportation purposes generally, T. 32, C. 3.

Bridge repair bonds, § 32-4-70 et seq.

36-14-1. Erection of bridges across navigable streams.

Statute text

The consent of the state is given to and authority is vested in the county governing authority to erect bridges across the navigable streams that lie wholly within the state, whenever in the judgment of the county governing authority the public interest may be subserved thereby, upon its compliance with the law of Congress requiring the approval of the secretary of transportation and the chief of engineers of the United States, as embodied in the statutes of the United States passed by the Fifty-fifth Congress and approved March 3, 1899.

History

(Ga. L. 1904, p. 100, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 427; Code 1933, § 23-2004.)

Annotations

U.S. Code. - The federal Act referred to in this Code section is codified at 33 U.S.C. §§ 401, 403.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 39 Am. Jur. 2d, Highways, Streets, and Bridges, §§ 44 et seq., 92 et seq.

C.J.S. - 11 C.J.S., Bridges, § 4 et seq.

36-14-2. Building and maintaining bridges over rivers bordering adjacent states.

Statute text

Counties lying adjacent to any river on the border or forming the boundary between this state and another shall have the same power, acting by and through the proper county authorities, to build and maintain bridges over such river as the counties now have to build and maintain bridges over streams lying wholly within their borders, provided that this power shall not be exercised except to cooperate with the proper authorities of the adjacent state in building and maintaining such bridges, on the principle that each state is to build simultaneously from its own bank to the middle of the river and afterwards to maintain and keep up the part of the bridge which it has built; and provided, further, that no bridge shall be erected under this Code section at any point where the river exceeds, at low-water mark, 2,000 feet in breadth.

History

(Ga. L. 1895, p. 78, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 372; Civil Code 1910, § 424; Ga. L. 1920, p. 62, § 1; Code 1933, § 23-2001; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in Havird v. Richmond County, 47 Ga. App. 580, 171 S.E. 220 (1933).

36-14-3. Contracts with federal government for bridges across streams bordering land ceded to United States.

Statute text

(a) The county governing authority may contract and pay out of the funds of the county such sums of money as it deems equitable and just to the authorities of the United States for the county's fair proportion of the cost of building any bridge which it deems necessary to erect across any stream dividing the county or some part thereof from lands over which the jurisdiction has been ceded to the government of the United States for any purpose, provided that it shall thereafter be the duty of the authorities of the United States to keep such bridges in repair, to renew them as often as may be necessary, and to keep them open for the free and uninterrupted travel of the public.

(b) The United States is vested with full and complete jurisdiction over grounds necessary for the erection of piers and approaches to such bridges on each side of such streams, so far as may be necessary for the erection, repair, and protection of the bridges and approaches.

History

(Ga. L. 1895, p. 76, §§ 1, 2; Civil Code 1895, §§ 373, 374; Civil Code 1910, §§ 425, 426; Code 1933, §§ 23-2002, 23-2003.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 39 Am. Jur. 2d, Highways, Streets, and Bridges, § 45.

——————————

CHAPTER 15

COUNTY LAW LIBRARY

Sec.

36-15-1. Board of trustees created in each county; composition; chairperson; quorum.

36-15-2. Secretary-treasurer of board; designation and compensation of librarian.

36-15-3. Bond of secretary-treasurer.

36-15-4. Powers and duties of board of trustees generally.

36-15-5. Control, deposit, and investment of funds.

36-15-6. Receipt and investment of money and property.

36-15-7. Use of funds.

36-15-8. Furnishing of space and utilities by county governing authority.

36-15-9. Collection of additional costs in court cases; amount; determination of need as prerequisite to collection; collection in certain criminal cases.

36-15-10. Prior actions, decisions, contracts, and purchases of boards prior to March 19, 1971, ratified.

36-15-11. Receipt and disbursement of funds by counties having population of 950,000 or more [Repealed].

36-15-12. Applicability to city court of city having population of 300,000 or more.

36-15-13. Annual audit required.

Annotations

Cross references. - County and regional public libraries, § 20-5-40 et seq.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Assistant district attorneys eligible to serve on library board. - Assistant district attorneys are practicing attorneys within the meaning of Ga. L. 1971, p. 180, § 1 et seq.; therefore, an assistant district attorney is eligible to serve as a member of the board of trustees of a county law library. 1973 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U73-112.

36-15-1. Board of trustees created in each county; composition; chairperson; quorum.

Statute text

There is created in each county in this state a board to be known as the board of trustees of the county law library, hereafter referred to as the board. The board shall consist of the chief judge of the superior court of the circuit in which the county is located; the judge of the probate court; the senior judge of the state court, if any; the chief judge of the magistrate court; the district attorney of the circuit in which the county is located; a solicitor-general of the state court, if any; the clerk of the superior court; and two practicing attorneys of the county. The practicing attorneys shall be selected by the other trustees and shall serve at their pleasure. All of the trustees shall serve without pay. The chief judge of the superior court shall be chairperson of the board. A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of transacting all business that may come before the board.

History

(Ga. L. 1971, p. 180, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 430, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 392, § 1; Ga. L. 2016, p. 435, § 2/HB 851; Ga. L. 2017, p. 548, § 1/HB 453.)

Annotations

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, inserted "the chief judge of the magistrate court;" in the middle of the second sentence.

36-15-2. Secretary-treasurer of board; designation and compensation of librarian.

Statute text

(a) There is created an office to be known as secretary-treasurer of the board of trustees of the county law library in each county. The secretary-treasurer shall be selected and appointed by the board and shall serve at the pleasure of the board. The board may appoint one of its own members as secretary-treasurer or, in its discretion, may designate some other person to act as secretary-treasurer of the board. The secretary-treasurer of the board shall perform the duties provided for the treasurer in this chapter.

(b) The board of trustees may designate the judge of the probate court or a deputy clerk of the superior court of each county to act as librarian; any such official shall not receive any additional compensation for the performance of such duties. The board, however, in its discretion, may designate some other person to act as librarian and shall fix the compensation for such person.

History

(Ga. L. 1971, p. 180, § 2; Ga. L. 1973, p. 430, § 2; Ga. L. 1976, p. 700, § 1.)

Annotations

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Dual capacity prohibited. - Librarian designated and compensated under this section may not serve in dual capacity as librarian-secretary. 1975 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U75-16.

36-15-3. Bond of secretary-treasurer.

Statute text

The secretary-treasurer of the board shall give a good and sufficient surety bond, payable to the county, in such an amount as may be determined by the board, to account faithfully for all funds received and disbursed by him. The premium on the bond shall be paid out of the county law library fund.

History

(Ga. L. 1971, p. 180, § 8.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 160.

36-15-4. Powers and duties of board of trustees generally.

Statute text

The board of trustees is given the following powers and duties:

(1) To provide for the collection of all money provided for in this chapter;

(2) To select the books, reports, texts, and periodicals;

(3) To make all necessary rules and regulations governing the use of the library;

(4) To keep records of all its meetings and proceedings;

(5) To exercise all other powers necessary for the proper administration of this chapter; and

(6) To enter into agreements with the boards of trustees of other county law libraries within the same judicial circuit for the purpose of pooling funds to purchase books, reports, texts, and periodicals and to purchase or lease computer related research equipment and programs; to provide for the joint use of such books, reports, texts, periodicals, and computer related research equipment and programs within the same judicial circuit; and to provide where said books, reports, texts, periodicals, and computer related research equipment and programs may be maintained.

History

(Ga. L. 1971, p. 180, § 4; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1923, § 1.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1994, "computer related" was substituted for "computer-related" in three places in paragraph (6).

36-15-5. Control, deposit, and investment of funds.

Statute text

The board shall have control of the funds provided for in this chapter. All funds received shall be deposited in a special account to be known as the county law library fund. The board shall have authority to expend the funds in accordance with this chapter and to invest any of the funds so received in any investments which are legal investments for fiduciaries in this state.

History

(Ga. L. 1971, p. 180, § 3.)

36-15-6. Receipt and investment of money and property.

Statute text

The board may take, by gift, grant, devise, or bequest, any money, real or personal property, or other thing of value and may hold or invest the same for the uses and purposes of the library.

History

(Ga. L. 1971, p. 180, § 5.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 219 et seq.

36-15-7. Use of funds.

Statute text

(a) The money paid into the hands of the treasurer of the board of trustees of the county law library shall be used for the purchase of law books, reports, texts, periodicals, supplies, desks, and equipment and for the maintenance, upkeep, and operation of the law library, including the services of a librarian and, within the discretion of the board of trustees, payment for purchases made by a county's superior court, state court, probate court, magistrate court, or juvenile court, and for the purchase or leasing of computer related legal research equipment and programs, and, at the discretion of the county governing authority, for the establishment and maintenance of the codification of county ordinances. However, the amount transferred to the county governing authority for codification pursuant to this subsection shall not exceed the cost of establishing or maintaining the codification.

(b) In addition to the uses specified in subsection (a) of this Code section, the board of trustees of a county law library shall be authorized to use funds to establish a law library or libraries for the judges of the superior courts of the judicial circuit and for the judges of the state court in which the county lies. A request for the establishment of one or more such libraries shall be made to the board of trustees by the chief judge of the judicial circuit with the assent of a majority of the superior court judges of the circuit or by the chief judge of the state court of the county with the assent of a majority of the state court judges of the county. Additionally, the probate judge, chief magistrate, presiding juvenile court judge, or any chief judge of any county court may make a similar request. It shall be in the discretion of the board of trustees of each county whether to grant such a request. Any one or more county boards of trustees in the judicial circuit may participate in the establishment of the law library or libraries and, for the purpose of such participation, may enter into agreements regarding the proportional share of expenditures to be borne by each county board of trustees. Purchases made from county law library funds under this subsection shall not duplicate the law books and materials supplied to each judge by the state or by other sources. Such purchases shall become the property of the judge who requested the purchase and shall be passed on to his or her successor in office.

(c) In the event the board of trustees determines in its discretion that it has excess funds, such funds as may be designated by the board of trustees shall be disbursed by the board of trustees to charitable tax-exempt organizations which provide civil legal representation for low-income people; used to purchase software, equipment, fixtures, or furnishings for any office related to county judicial facilities or services, including, but not limited to, courtrooms and jury rooms; or turned over to the county commissioners and used by the county commissioners for the purchase of software, equipment, fixtures, or furnishings for the courthouse.

(d) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, all law books, reports, texts, and periodicals purchased by the use of gifts and from the funds of the county law library shall become the property of the county.

History

(Ga. L. 1971, p. 180, § 7; Ga. L. 1973, p. 430, § 4; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1103, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 27; Ga. L. 1987, p. 843, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1923, § 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 392, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 865, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 785, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 555, § 1/HB 858; Ga. L. 2016, p. 435, § 3/HB 851.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1994, "computer related" was substituted for "computer-related" in the first sentence of subsection (a).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Subscription to computer assisted legal research. - County law libraries may execute base subscription agreements for computer assisted legal research and purchase or lease related equipment. 1983 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U83-22.

36-15-8. Furnishing of space and utilities by county governing authority.

Statute text

The county governing authority shall furnish necessary space, offices, lights, heat, and water for the maintenance of the county law library.

History

(Ga. L. 1976, p. 700, § 3.)

36-15-9. Collection of additional costs in court cases; amount; determination of need as prerequisite to collection; collection in certain criminal cases.

Statute text

(a) For the purpose of providing funds for those uses specified in Code Section 36-15-7, a sum not to exceed $5.00, in addition to all other legal costs, may be charged and collected in each action or case, either civil or criminal, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, all adoptions, certiorari, applications by personal representatives for leave to sell or reinvest, trade name registrations, applications for change of name, and all other proceedings of civil or criminal or quasi-criminal nature, filed in the superior, state, probate, and any other courts of record, except county recorders' courts or municipal courts. The amount of such additional costs to be charged and collected, if any, in each such case shall be fixed by the chief judge of the superior court of the circuit in which such county is located. Such additional costs shall not be charged and collected unless the chief judge first determines that a need exists for a law library in the county. The clerk of each and every such court in such counties in which such a law library is established shall collect such fees and remit the same to the treasurer of the board of trustees of the county law library of the county in which the case was brought, on the first day of each month. Where fees collected by the treasurer have been allocated for the purpose of establishing or maintaining the codification of county ordinances, the allocated amount shall in turn be remitted by the treasurer to the county governing authority for said purpose on a monthly basis or as otherwise agreed by the treasurer and the county governing authority. The county ordinance code provided for in subsection (a) of Code Section 36-15-7 shall be maintained by the county governing authority. When the costs in criminal cases are not collected, the cost provided in this Code section shall be paid from the fine and bond forfeiture fund of the court in which the case is filed, before any other disbursement or distribution of such fines or forfeitures is made.

(a.1) In any county having a population of more than 550,000 according to the United States decennial census of 1980 or any future such census, the power and authority provided in subsection (a) of this Code section for the chief judge shall be exercised by the superior court judge who has the most service as a superior court judge.

(b) A case, within the meaning of subsection (a) of this Code section, shall mean and be construed as any matter which is docketed upon the official dockets of the enumerated courts and to which a number is assigned, whether such matter is contested or not.

(c) Reserved.

(d) Notwithstanding that provision of subsection (a) of this Code section which excepts recorders' courts from the requirement of charging and collecting the additional costs provided for by said subsection (a), said subsection (a) and subsection (b) of this Code section shall be applicable to the recorder's court of each county of this state having a population of not less than 200,000 nor more than 275,000 according to the United States decennial census of 1980 or any future such census.

(e) Notwithstanding that provision of subsection (a) of this Code section which excepts county recorders' courts and municipal courts from the requirement of charging and collecting the additional costs provided for by that subsection (a), subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section shall apply to any municipal court of a municipality if the governing authority thereof, by ordinance or resolutions, approves the charging and collecting of such costs pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section.

(f) Reserved.

(g) In counties where a law library authorized by this chapter has not been established, upon request of the county governing authority, the chief judge of a circuit shall direct that the fees authorized by this Code section be charged and collected for the purpose of the establishment and maintenance of the codification of county ordinances. However, the amount transferred to the county governing authority pursuant to this subsection shall not exceed the cost of establishing or maintaining the codification. The clerk of each and every court in such counties in which costs are collected for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this subsection shall remit the same to the county governing authority on the first day of each month. The county ordinance code provided for in this subsection shall be maintained by the county governing authority. When the costs in criminal cases are not collected, the cost provided in this Code section shall be paid from the fine and bond forfeiture fund of the court in which the case is filed before any other disbursement or distribution of such fines or forfeitures is made.

History

(Ga. L. 1971, p. 180, §§ 6, 9; Ga. L. 1973, p. 430, § 3; Ga. L. 1976, p. 700, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 520, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 591, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1103, § 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 27; Ga. L. 1985, p. 999, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1987, p. 843, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1324, § 6; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 36; Ga. L. 1994, p. 237, § 2; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1923, § 3; Ga. L. 1997, p. 392, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 36; Ga. L. 2000, p. 865, § 2; Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 3-33/HB 233; Ga. L. 2016, p. 435, § 4/HB 851.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, "recorders'" was substituted for "recorder's" in subsection (e).

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 4-1/HB 233, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2015, and shall apply to seizures of property for forfeiture that occur on or after that date. Any such seizure that occurs before July 1, 2015, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such seizure."

Law reviews. - For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2015).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Costs not authorized in addition to costs for filing articles of incorporation. - Clerks of superior courts are not authorized to collect costs in support of county law libraries as authorized in Ga. L. 1976, p. 700, § 2 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-15-9) in addition to those costs set forth in former Code 1933, § 22-803 (see now O.C.G.A. § 14-2-122(1)) for the filing of articles of incorporation. 1977 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 77-23.

Surcharge is an additional penalty to be added to the fine. 1996 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U96-8.

Section applicable to probate courts. - Probate court is expressly authorized to collect costs in support of county law libraries in all actions specified by O.C.G.A. § 36-15-9. 1988 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U88-3.

Actions filed under Family Violence Act. - Clerk of the superior court would be authorized to collect costs in support of county law libraries as authorized by the chief judge in any action filed under the Family Violence Act, O.C.G.A. § 19-13-1 et seq. 1988 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U88-11.

36-15-10. Prior actions, decisions, contracts, and purchases of boards prior to March 19, 1971, ratified.

Statute text

All actions, decisions, contracts, and purchases made by any board of trustees of a county law library or any other person charged with the responsibility of operating or maintaining a county law library under any law of this state enacted prior to March 19, 1971, are ratified.

History

(Ga. L. 1971, p. 180, § 10.)

36-15-11. Receipt and disbursement of funds by counties having population of 950,000 or more.

Statute text

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 2019, p. 723, § 1/HB 134, effective May 7, 2019.

Annotations

Editor's notes. - This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1981, p. 959, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1031, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 555, § 3/HB 858.

36-15-12. Applicability to city court of city having population of 300,000 or more.

Statute text

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, this chapter shall not apply to a city court, which is authorized to try state traffic offenses, of any city of this state having a population of 300,000 or more according to the United States decennial census of 1980 or any future such census.

History

(Ga. L. 1982, p. 586, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-15-12, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 586, § 2.)

36-15-13. Annual audit required.

Statute text

Each board created pursuant to this chapter shall, at the end of each fiscal year for the preceding year, have an annual audit of its financial affairs, books, and accounts performed by the county accountant as employed pursuant to Code Section 36-1-10; the internal auditor employed by the governing authority of the county, if such internal auditor is a certified public accountant; or a certified public accountant. The determination of the performance of such audit by the county accountant, the internal auditor, or a certified public accountant shall be made by the board. Such audit shall be conducted in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, including, but not limited to, a report on whether the control, deposit, and investment of funds, the receipt and investment of money and property, and the use of funds by such board have been conducted as provided for under this chapter. A copy of such audit shall be made available to the governing authority of the county and shall be a public document.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-15-13, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 435, § 5/HB 851.)

——————————

CHAPTER 16

COUNTY HISTORICAL CONTAINER

Sec.

36-16-1. Furnishing of historical container.

36-16-2. Receipt of historical data for preservation in container.

36-16-3. Determination of admissibility of documents submitted for filing; deposit of documents relating to soldiers and widows.

36-16-4. Maintenance of record and index; fee for filing of documents.

36-16-5. Applicability of chapter.

36-16-1. Furnishing of historical container.

Statute text

The county governing authority shall furnish, purchase, or cause to be furnished or purchased a suitable filing case or other container to be placed in the office of the judge of the probate court of the county and labeled "Historical."

History

(Ga. L. 1935, p. 383, § 1.)

36-16-2. Receipt of historical data for preservation in container.

Statute text

The judge of the probate court of the county shall be required to receive from any responsible citizen or citizens any data of a historical nature and place the same on file in the historical container provided for in Code Section 36-16-1, for safe preservation and historical reference. The matter to be entered for preservation must be of general interest and not of a personal nature; it may include records, proceedings, or minutes of any religious body or organization; school records not otherwise preserved; records of civic, patriotic, or fraternal organizations; and records of purely community affairs when of such nature as to be of general interest and not otherwise recorded by court procedure.

History

(Ga. L. 1935, p. 383, § 2.)

36-16-3. Determination of admissibility of documents submitted for filing; deposit of documents relating to soldiers and widows.

Statute text

The judge of the probate court and the county board of education are made the sole judges of the admissibility of any matter or document which may be submitted to the judge of the probate court for filing, should any question arise as to the historical value of such matter or document so submitted; and the judge of the probate court and the board of education sitting in regular session shall have authority to accept or reject any matter so submitted, provided that the judge of the probate court shall be required to deposit in the historical container all documents in his office pertaining to records of Confederate soldiers and widows of such soldiers, as well as soldiers and their surviving spouses of all other wars of our nation, a record of which he may have in his office, and to make proper notations thereof in the book of record.

History

(Ga. L. 1935, p. 383, § 4.)

36-16-4. Maintenance of record and index; fee for filing of documents.

Statute text

The judge of the probate court shall be required to keep a suitable record and index in a book prepared for that purpose of all matter placed in the historical container, with notations as to the nature of the matter on file, by whom, and when placed on file. He shall be entitled to a fee of 25›, payable by the person filing such historical matter, for each article or document so deposited by such person for preservation with him, provided that the county historian may submit documents for preservation without payment of a fee to the judge of the probate court.

History

(Ga. L. 1935, p. 383, §§ 3, 4.)

36-16-5. Applicability of chapter.

Statute text

This chapter shall not become operative in any county of this state until it has been adopted and recommended by a majority vote of two successive regular grand juries of the county.

History

(Ga. L. 1935, p. 383, § 5.)

——————————

CHAPTER 17

GRANTS OF STATE FUNDS TO COUNTIES

Article 1
